North Dakota statutes. TITLE 7 Building and Loan Associations [Repealed]
CHAPTER 7-01 Organization, Qualification, and Consolidation [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6, effective August 1, 2009]

Note.

Section 6 of ch. 78, S.L. 2007 provides for the repeal of Title 7 effective August 1, 2009.

7-01-01.
Definition — Supervision. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-01-02.
Scope of title. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-01-03.
Articles of incorporation — Contents. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-01-03.1.
License fees payable by savings and loan or building and loan associations. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-01-04.
Amount of capital defined — Paid in — Maintained. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-01-05.
Contents and adoption of bylaws. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-01-06.
Approval of bylaws by state banking board. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-01-07.
Certificate of state banking board required — Examination by board — Review by court — Federal deposit insurance required. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-01-08.
Action by district court — Appeal. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-01-09.
Issuance of certificate by state banking board — Filing of articles. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-01-10.
Promotional contracts prohibited. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-01-11.
Consolidation authorized. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-01-12.
Conversion into federal association — Procedure. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-01-13.
Supervision after conversion — Transfer of assets — Obligations. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-01-14.
State savings and loan association conversion to state bank. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-01-15.
Savings association conversion. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]